Utah statutes.
75-7-301.   Basic effect.
(1)  Notice to a person who may represent and bind another person under this
part has the same effect as if notice were given directly to the other person.
(2)  The consent of a person who may represent and bind another person under
this part is binding on the person represented unless the person represented
objects to the representation before the consent would otherwise have become
effective.
(3)  Except as otherwise provided in Sections 75-7-411 and 25-6-14, a person
who under this part may represent a settlor who lacks capacity may receive
notice and give a binding consent on the settlor's behalf.
